test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NI_O_bagwaaniigin_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfs
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:
     
  NI - O - bagwaaniigin :
     
  #Template Key
  #1	2	3	4	5	6	7
  #per	dim	the	pej	pos	mod	num
     
     #Isolation form
     bagwaaniigin: bagwaaniigin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1
     1+bagwaaniigin: nibagwaaniigin
     2+bagwaaniigin: gibagwaaniigin
     3+bagwaaniigin: obagwaaniigin
     X+bagwaaniigin: ibagwaaniigin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2
     bagwaaniigin+NI+Con: bagwaaniiginoonh
     bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim: bagwaaniiginoons
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4
     bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej: bagwaaniiginosh
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 6
     bagwaaniigin+NI+Pret: bagwaaniiginoban
     bagwaaniigin+NI+VocPl: [bagwaaniiginodig, bagwaaniiginodog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 7
     bagwaaniigin+NI+Loc: bagwaaniiginong
     bagwaaniigin+NI+Obv: bagwaaniiginooan
     bagwaaniigin+NI+Pl: bagwaaniiginooan
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con: nibagwaaniiginoonh
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim: nibagwaaniiginoons
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con: gibagwaaniiginoonh
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim: gibagwaaniiginoons
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con: obagwaaniiginoonh
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim: obagwaaniiginoons
     X+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con: ibagwaaniiginoonh
     X+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim: ibagwaaniiginoons
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos: nibagwaaniiginom
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos: gibagwaaniiginom
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos: obagwaaniiginom
     X+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos: ibagwaaniiginom
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej: nibagwaaniiginosh
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej: gibagwaaniiginosh
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej: obagwaaniiginosh
     X+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej: ibagwaaniiginosh
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+1Pl: nibagwaaniiginonaan
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+21: gibagwaaniiginonaan
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+2Pl: gibagwaaniiginowaa
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+3Obv: obagwaaniiginoni
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+3Pl: obagwaaniiginowaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 6
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pret: nibagwaaniiginoban
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+VocPl: [nibagwaaniiginodig, nibagwaaniiginodog]
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pret: gibagwaaniiginoban
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+VocPl: [gibagwaaniiginodig, gibagwaaniiginodog]
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pret: obagwaaniiginoban
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+VocPl: [obagwaaniiginodig, obagwaaniiginodog]
     X+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pret: ibagwaaniiginoban
     X+bagwaaniigin+NI+VocPl: [ibagwaaniiginodig, ibagwaaniiginodog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 7
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Loc: nibagwaaniiginong
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Obv: nibagwaaniiginooan
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pl: nibagwaaniiginooan
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Loc: gibagwaaniiginong
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Obv: gibagwaaniiginooan
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pl: gibagwaaniiginooan
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Loc: obagwaaniiginong
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Obv: obagwaaniiginooan
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pl: obagwaaniiginooan
     X+bagwaaniigin+NI+Loc: ibagwaaniiginong
     X+bagwaaniigin+NI+Obv: ibagwaaniiginooan
     X+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pl: ibagwaaniiginooan
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4
     bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pej: bagwaaniiginoonyish
     bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pej: bagwaaniiginoonsish
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 6
     bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pret: bagwaaniiginoonyiban
     bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+VocPl: [bagwaaniiginoonyidig, bagwaaniiginoonyidog]
     bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pret: bagwaaniiginoonsiban
     bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+VocPl: [bagwaaniiginoonsidig, bagwaaniiginoonsidog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 7
     bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Loc: bagwaaniiginoonying
     bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Obv: bagwaaniiginoonyin
     bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pl: bagwaaniiginoonyin
     bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Loc: bagwaaniiginoonsing
     bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Obv: bagwaaniiginoonsan
     bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pl: bagwaaniiginoonsan
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 6
     bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+Pret: bagwaaniiginoshiban
     bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+VocPl: [bagwaaniiginoshidig, bagwaaniiginoshidog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 7
     bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+Loc: bagwaaniiginoshing
     bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+Obv: bagwaaniiginoshan
     bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+Pl: bagwaaniiginoshan
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 6, 7
     bagwaaniigin+NI+Pret+Loc: bagwaaniiginobaniing
     bagwaaniigin+NI+Pret+Obv: bagwaaniiginobaniin
     bagwaaniigin+NI+Pret+Pl: bagwaaniiginobaniin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pos: nibagwaaniiginoonyim
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pos: nibagwaaniiginoonsim
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pos: gibagwaaniiginoonyim
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pos: gibagwaaniiginoonsim
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pos: obagwaaniiginoonyim
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pos: obagwaaniiginoonsim
     X+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pos: ibagwaaniiginoonyim
     X+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pos: ibagwaaniiginoonsim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pej: nibagwaaniiginoonyish
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pej: nibagwaaniiginoonsish
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pej: gibagwaaniiginoonyish
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pej: gibagwaaniiginoonsish
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pej: obagwaaniiginoonyish
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pej: obagwaaniiginoonsish
     X+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pej: ibagwaaniiginoonyish
     X+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pej: ibagwaaniiginoonsish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 5
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+1Pl: nibagwaaniiginoonyinaan
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+1Pl: nibagwaaniiginoonsinaan
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+21: gibagwaaniiginoonyinaan
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+2Pl: gibagwaaniiginoonyiwaa
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+21: gibagwaaniiginoonsinaan
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+2Pl: gibagwaaniiginoonsiwaa
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+3Obv: obagwaaniiginoonyini
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+3Pl: obagwaaniiginoonyiwaa
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+3Obv: obagwaaniiginoonsini
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+3Pl: obagwaaniiginoonsiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 6
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pret: nibagwaaniiginoonyiban
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+VocPl: [nibagwaaniiginoonyidig, nibagwaaniiginoonyidog]
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pret: nibagwaaniiginoonsiban
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+VocPl: [nibagwaaniiginoonsidig, nibagwaaniiginoonsidog]
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pret: gibagwaaniiginoonyiban
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+VocPl: [gibagwaaniiginoonyidig, gibagwaaniiginoonyidog]
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pret: gibagwaaniiginoonsiban
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+VocPl: [gibagwaaniiginoonsidig, gibagwaaniiginoonsidog]
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pret: obagwaaniiginoonyiban
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+VocPl: [obagwaaniiginoonyidig, obagwaaniiginoonyidog]
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pret: obagwaaniiginoonsiban
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+VocPl: [obagwaaniiginoonsidig, obagwaaniiginoonsidog]
     X+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pret: ibagwaaniiginoonyiban
     X+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+VocPl: [ibagwaaniiginoonyidig, ibagwaaniiginoonyidog]
     X+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pret: ibagwaaniiginoonsiban
     X+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+VocPl: [ibagwaaniiginoonsidig, ibagwaaniiginoonsidog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 7
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Loc: nibagwaaniiginoonying
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Obv: nibagwaaniiginoonyin
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pl: nibagwaaniiginoonyin
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Loc: nibagwaaniiginoonsing
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Obv: nibagwaaniiginoonsan
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pl: nibagwaaniiginoonsan
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Loc: gibagwaaniiginoonying
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Obv: gibagwaaniiginoonyin
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pl: gibagwaaniiginoonyin
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Loc: gibagwaaniiginoonsing
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Obv: gibagwaaniiginoonsan
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pl: gibagwaaniiginoonsan
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Loc: obagwaaniiginoonying
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Obv: obagwaaniiginoonyin
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pl: obagwaaniiginoonyin
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Loc: obagwaaniiginoonsing
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Obv: obagwaaniiginoonsan
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pl: obagwaaniiginoonsan
     X+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Loc: ibagwaaniiginoonying
     X+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Obv: ibagwaaniiginoonyin
     X+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pl: ibagwaaniiginoonyin
     X+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Loc: ibagwaaniiginoonsing
     X+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Obv: ibagwaaniiginoonsan
     X+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pl: ibagwaaniiginoonsan
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej: nibagwaaniiginomish
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej: gibagwaaniiginomish
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej: obagwaaniiginomish
     X+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej: ibagwaaniiginomish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+1Pl: nibagwaaniiginominaan
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+21: gibagwaaniiginominaan
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+2Pl: gibagwaaniiginomiwaa
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+3Obv: obagwaaniiginomini
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+3Pl: obagwaaniiginomiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 6
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pret: nibagwaaniiginomiban
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+VocPl: [nibagwaaniiginomidig, nibagwaaniiginomidog]
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pret: gibagwaaniiginomiban
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+VocPl: [gibagwaaniiginomidig, gibagwaaniiginomidog]
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pret: obagwaaniiginomiban
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+VocPl: [obagwaaniiginomidig, obagwaaniiginomidog]
     X+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pret: ibagwaaniiginomiban
     X+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+VocPl: [ibagwaaniiginomidig, ibagwaaniiginomidog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 7
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Loc: nibagwaaniiginoming
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Obv: nibagwaaniiginoman
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pl: nibagwaaniiginoman
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Loc: gibagwaaniiginoming
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Obv: gibagwaaniiginoman
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pl: gibagwaaniiginoman
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Loc: obagwaaniiginoming
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Obv: obagwaaniiginoman
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pl: obagwaaniiginoman
     X+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Loc: ibagwaaniiginoming
     X+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Obv: ibagwaaniiginoman
     X+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pl: ibagwaaniiginoman
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+1Pl: nibagwaaniiginoshinaan
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+21: gibagwaaniiginoshinaan
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+2Pl: gibagwaaniiginoshiwaa
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+3Obv: obagwaaniiginoshini
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+3Pl: obagwaaniiginoshiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 6
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+Pret: nibagwaaniiginoshiban
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+VocPl: [nibagwaaniiginoshidig, nibagwaaniiginoshidog]
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+Pret: gibagwaaniiginoshiban
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+VocPl: [gibagwaaniiginoshidig, gibagwaaniiginoshidog]
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+Pret: obagwaaniiginoshiban
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+VocPl: [obagwaaniiginoshidig, obagwaaniiginoshidog]
     X+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+Pret: ibagwaaniiginoshiban
     X+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+VocPl: [ibagwaaniiginoshidig, ibagwaaniiginoshidog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 7
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+Loc: nibagwaaniiginoshing
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+Obv: nibagwaaniiginoshan
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+Pl: nibagwaaniiginoshan
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+Loc: gibagwaaniiginoshing
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+Obv: gibagwaaniiginoshan
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+Pl: gibagwaaniiginoshan
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+Loc: obagwaaniiginoshing
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+Obv: obagwaaniiginoshan
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+Pl: obagwaaniiginoshan
